Tennessee, session 114, SB0812.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-7-227, is amended by adding the
following as a new subdivision:
( ) An assistant district attorney is eligible to receive year-for-year service credit
for prior law enforcement experience upon the recommendation of the hiring district
attorney general, and subject to the approval of the executive director of the Tennessee
district attorneys general conference;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-7-227, is amended by designating
the current language as subsection (a) and adding the following subsection (b):
(b) As used in subdivision (a)( ), "prior law enforcement experience" means full-
time employment with a law enforcement agency as a POST-certified law enforcement
officer. An employment record from the law enforcement agency must be used to
establish the law enforcement experience.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0812
000499
- 1 -